Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.180

Treasurer and clerk may be combined.

The council of every town may provide by ordinance that the office of treasurer be combined with that of clerk or that the office of clerk be combined with that of treasurer. This ordinance shall not be voted upon until the next regular meeting after its introduction and shall require the vote of at least two-thirds of the council. The ordinance shall provide the date when the consolidation shall take place which date shall be not less than three months from the date the ordinance goes into effect.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.180. Prior: (i) 1945 c 58 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9177-1. (ii) 1945 c 58 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9177-4, part.]